Maryland, session 2026, HB1064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.10–102.
(a) There is a Maryland Office of the Inspector General for Education IN THE
MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
(b) [The Office is an independent unit of the State.
(c)] The purpose of the Office is to provide accountability and transparency in the
expenditure of public funds for education in the State.
[(d) All expenses and operations related to the administration of the Office shall
be separately identified and independent of any other unit of State government.]
9.10–103.
(f) [(1)] The Inspector General is entitled to the salary provided in the State
budget.
[(2) Funding for the Office shall be as provided in the State budget.]
9.10–104.

HOUSE BILL 1064 3
[(j) The Inspector General may appoint and employ professional and clerical staff,
including attorneys, accountants, auditors, analysts, and investigators, as appropriated in
the annual State budget, to conduct the work of the Office.]
Article – Health – General
2–502.
(a) There is a Maryland Office of the Inspector General for Health IN THE
MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
(b) [The Office is an independent unit of the State.
(c)] (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Office shall have access
to the following services of the Department:
(i) Information technology;
(ii) Budget and finance;
(iii) Human resources;
(iv) Police;
(v) Procurement; and
(vi) Support services.
(2) The Office shall, in consultation with the Department, develop policies
and adopt regulations regarding the use and confidentiality of the services listed in
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
[(d)] (C) The Office shall:
(1) Maintain a physical location within the Department; and
(2) Develop policies and adopt regulations regarding the use and
confidentiality of the location of the Office.
2–502.1.
(f) [(1)] The Inspector General is entitled to the salary provided in the State
budget.
[(2) Funding for the Office shall be as provided in the State budget.]

HOUSE BILL 1064
Article – State Government
TITLE 7.5. INSPECTOR GENERAL.
7.5–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “INSPECTOR GENERAL” MEANS THE INSPECTOR GENERAL OF THE
STATE.
(C) “OFFICE” MEANS THE MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL.
(D) “UNIT” MEANS AN AGENCY OR A UNIT OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF
STATE GOVERNMENT.
7.5–102.
(A) THERE IS AN INSPECTOR GENERAL OF THE STATE.
(B) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL IS ELIGIBLE TO BE THE INSPECTOR GENERAL
ONLY IF THE INDIVIDUAL EXECUTES AN AFFIDAVIT STATING THAT THE INDIVIDUAL
WILL NOT ACCEPT APPOINTMENT TO, OR BE A CANDIDATE FOR, A STATE OR LOCAL
OFFICE:
(I) DURING THE PERIOD OF SERVICE AS THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL; AND
(II) FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS IMMEDIATELY AFTER THE
INDIVIDUAL LAST SERVES AS THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
(2) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL RENEW THE AFFIDAVIT EVERY
2 YEARS DURING THE PERIOD OF SERVICE.
(3) A FAILURE TO RENEW THE AFFIDAVIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL SUBJECT THE INSPECTOR GENERAL TO REMOVAL FROM OFFICE UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(C) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL BE APPOINTED UNANIMOUSLY
BY THE GOVERNOR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, AND THE STATE TREASURER,
SUBJECT TO THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE.

HOUSE BILL 1064 5
(2) THE TERM OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS 5 YEARS, BEGINNING
JULY 1 AFTER THE APPOINTMENT OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL
CONTINUE TO SERVE UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED.
(4) IF A VACANCY OCCURS IN THE OFFICE, AN INTERIM INSPECTOR
GENERAL SHALL BE APPOINTED AS A SUCCESSOR FOR THE REMAINDER OF THE
UNEXPIRED TERM.
(D) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY BE REMOVED UNANIMOUSLY BY THE
GOVERNOR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, AND THE STATE TREASURER FOR:
(1) MISCONDUCT IN OFFICE;
(2) PERSISTENT FAILURE TO PERFORM THE DUTIES OF THE OFFICE;
OR
(3) CONDUCT PREJUDICIAL TO THE PROPER ADMINISTRATION OF
JUSTICE.
(E) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL BE PROFESSIONALLY QUALIFIED
THROUGH EXPERIENCE OR EDUCATION IN AT LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
AREAS:
(1) LAW;
(2) AUDITING;
(3) GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS; OR
(4) FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT.
(F) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS ENTITLED TO:
(1) THE SALARY PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET; AND
(2) REIMBURSEMENT FOR TRAVEL AND OTHER EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET,
THAT ARE CONNECTED WITH THE DUTIES OF THE OFFICE.
7.5–103.

HOUSE BILL 1064
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
(B) THE OFFICE SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL;
(2) STAFF AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET;
(3) THE MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL FOR
EDUCATION ESTABLISHED IN TITLE 9.10 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; AND
(4) THE MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL FOR
HEALTH ESTABLISHED IN TITLE 2, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE.
(C) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL SUPERVISE AND DIRECT THE OFFICE.
(D) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY ESTABLISH OFFICE SPACE THAT
THE STATE SHALL MAINTAIN AND EQUIP.
(2) FUNDING FOR THE OFFICE SHALL BE AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
7.5–104.
(A) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY EMPLOY A STAFF IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(2) STAFF EMPLOYED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) SHALL:
1. PERFORM THE DUTIES THAT THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL ASSIGNS; AND
2. CARRY IDENTIFICATION CARDS THAT IDENTIFY THE
STAFF AS EMPLOYEES OF THE OFFICE;
(II) SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL;
AND
(III) ARE ENTITLED TO:

HOUSE BILL 1064 7
1. COMPENSATION AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET;
AND
2. REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(B) FROM AMONG THE EMPLOYEES ON THE STAFF, THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL MAY DESIGNATE ONE CHIEF DEPUTY INSPECTOR GENERAL AND ONE OR
MORE DEPUTY INSPECTORS GENERAL.
7.5–105.
(A) THE CHIEF DEPUTY INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL SERVE AS ACTING
INSPECTOR GENERAL IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS TEMPORARILY UNABLE OR
UNAVAILABLE TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES OF THE OFFICE.
(B) IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL GIVES THE CHIEF DEPUTY INSPECTOR
GENERAL WRITTEN NOTICE OF A TEMPORARY INABILITY OR UNAVAILABILITY:
(1) THE ACTING INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL SERVE ON AND AFTER
THE DATE THAT THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SETS IN THE NOTICE AND UNTIL THE
INSPECTOR GENERAL GIVES THE ACTING INSPECTOR GENERAL WRITTEN NOTICE
THAT THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS ABLE TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES OF THE
OFFICE; AND
(2) THE POSITION OF INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY NOT BE DEEMED
VACANT.
7.5–106.
(A) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL:
(1) RECEIVE COMPLAINTS OF WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT,
MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION IN THE UNITS; AND
(2) ESTABLISH A TOLL–FREE HOTLINE NUMBER AND WEBSITE
THROUGH WHICH ANONYMOUS COMPLAINTS MAY BE FILED.
(B) IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL RECEIVES A COMPLAINT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL DETERMINE
WHETHER THE COMPLAINT SHOULD BE INVESTIGATED.

HOUSE BILL 1064
(C) IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL DISCOVERS EVIDENCE OF CRIMINAL
ACTIVITY WHEN INVESTIGATING A COMPLAINT, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL
NOTIFY THE APPROPRIATE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
7.5–107.
(A) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL:
(1) MAY INVESTIGATE COMPLAINTS OF WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT,
MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION IN THE UNITS;
(2) MAY CONDUCT AUDITS OF THE UNITS;
(3) (I) SHALL COOPERATE WITH INVESTIGATIONS BY THE UNITS
OR OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL AGENCIES; AND
(II) IF A PRELIMINARY INVESTIGATION OF WASTE,
MISMANAGEMENT, MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION ESTABLISHES A
SUFFICIENT BASIS TO WARRANT REFERRAL, SHALL REFER THE MATTER TO THE
APPROPRIATE STATE OR FEDERAL ENFORCEMENT OFFICIALS; AND
(4) IN CARRYING OUT THE DUTIES UNDER ITEMS (1) THROUGH (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, SHALL TAKE STEPS TO ENSURE THAT A PERSON OR UNIT
SUBJECT TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE OFFICE IS NOT SUBJECT TO DUPLICATIVE
INVESTIGATIONS OR AUDITS.
(B) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY NOT DISCLOSE THE IDENTITY OF
THE SOURCE OF A COMPLAINT OR INFORMATION PROVIDED UNDER § 7.5–106 OF
THIS TITLE UNLESS THE INSPECTOR GENERAL:
(I) OBTAINS THE WRITTEN CONSENT OF THE SOURCE; OR
(II) DETERMINES THAT DISCLOSURE OF THE IDENTITY OF THE
SOURCE IS NECESSARY AND UNAVOIDABLE DURING THE COURSE OF THE
INVESTIGATION.
(2) IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL DETERMINES THAT DISCLOSURE OF
THE IDENTITY OF A SOURCE IS NECESSARY AND UNAVOIDABLE, THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL SHALL NOTIFY THE SOURCE IN WRITING AT LEAST 7 DAYS BEFORE
DISCLOSURE.
(C) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL PERIODICALLY SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1064 9
(1) REVIEW THE POLICIES AND PROCEDURES OF THE UNITS; AND
(2) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO IMPROVE THE POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES OF THE UNITS.
7.5–108.
(A) A UNIT SHALL COOPERATE FULLY WITH THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IN
AN INVESTIGATION OR AUDIT THAT IS CONDUCTED BY THE OFFICE.
(B) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL HAVE ACCESS TO ALL RECORDS,
DATA, REPORTS, CONTRACTS, CORRESPONDENCE, OR OTHER DOCUMENTS OF A
UNIT DURING AN INVESTIGATION OR AUDIT CONDUCTED BY THE OFFICE.
(C) IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE DUTIES OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL,
THE INSPECTOR GENERAL OR THE INSPECTOR GENERAL’S DESIGNEE MAY:
(1) SEEK AND OBTAIN SWORN TESTIMONY;
(2) COMPEL THE ATTENDANCE OF WITNESSES TO BE DEPOSED BY THE
OFFICE; AND
(3) COMPEL THE PRODUCTION OF RECORDS BY ISSUING A SUBPOENA
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY ISSUE A SUBPOENA OR SUBPOENA
DUCES TECUM ONLY WITH THE APPROVAL OF A JUDGE OF THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR
THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE OFFICE IS LOCATED.
(2) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL SUBMIT A WRITTEN
APPLICATION FOR THE APPROVAL SOUGHT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(3) A CIRCUIT COURT SHALL ISSUE A WRITTEN DECISION ON AN
APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 72
HOURS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION.
(4) A SUBPOENA ISSUED BY THE INSPECTOR GENERAL UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE SERVED IN THE SAME MANNER AS A SUBPOENA ISSUED BY A
CIRCUIT COURT.

HOUSE BILL 1064
(E) IF A PERSON REFUSES TO OBEY A SUBPOENA ISSUED BY THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT THAT APPROVED
THE ISSUANCE OF THE SUBPOENA UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION MAY:
(1) ISSUE AN ORDER TO THE PERSON REQUIRING THE PERSON TO
APPEAR BEFORE THE COURT TO SHOW CAUSE; AND
(2) AFTER CONDUCTING A HEARING, GRANT APPROPRIATE RELIEF.
7.5–109.
(A) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS TITLE.
(B) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP AN OPERATIONS MANUAL THAT CONFORMS TO THE
STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE ASSOCIATION OF INSPECTORS GENERAL;
(2) MAKE THE OPERATIONS MANUAL AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC ON
THE OFFICE’S WEBSITE; AND
(3) PROVIDE TRAINING AND EDUCATION FOR THE UNITS.
7.5–110.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, RECORDS
PREPARED OR OBTAINED BY THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IN CONNECTION WITH AN
INVESTIGATION OR AUDIT CONDUCTED BY THE OFFICE ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND
NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT UNTIL THE
FINAL REPORT ON THE INVESTIGATION OR AUDIT IS ISSUED UNDER § 7.5–111(B) OF
THIS TITLE.
(B) IF AN INDIVIDUAL REQUESTS A PUBLIC RECORD UNDER THE PUBLIC
INFORMATION ACT AND THE ONLY COPY OF THE PUBLIC RECORD HAS BEEN
OBTAINED BY THE INSPECTOR GENERAL, THE CUSTODIAN OF THE PUBLIC RECORD
SHALL CERTIFY THAT THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS IN POSSESSION OF THE ONLY
COPY OF THE RECORD AND THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL ALLOW THE
INDIVIDUAL TO EXAMINE AND COPY THE RECORD.
(C) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DISCLOSES A RECORD PROTECTED FROM
DISCLOSURE UNDER THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND IS SUBJECT

HOUSE BILL 1064 11
TO A FINE NOT TO EXCEED $2,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT TO EXCEED 1 YEAR OR
BOTH.
7.5–111.
(A) (1) AT THE END OF EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL
SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2) THE ANNUAL REPORT SHALL:
(I) DESCRIBE THE BUSINESS AND PROCEEDINGS OF THE
OFFICE DURING THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR; AND
(II) INCLUDE ANY RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE
ACTIVITIES OF THE UNITS THAT THE INSPECTOR GENERAL CONSIDERS
APPROPRIATE.
(B) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL ISSUE A FINAL REPORT ON AN
INVESTIGATION OR AUDIT COMPLETED BY THE OFFICE.
(2) THE FINAL REPORT ISSUED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, BEFORE RELEASING A FINAL REPORT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL PROVIDE AN OPPORTUNITY FOR
THE UNIT THAT WAS THE SUBJECT OF THE INVESTIGATION OR AUDIT TO RESPOND
TO THE REPORT.
(II) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE
AN OPPORTUNITY FOR RESPONSE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL, IN CONJUNCTION WITH A UNITED STATES ATTORNEY,
AN ATTORNEY GENERAL, A STATE’S ATTORNEY, OR ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE
PROSECUTORIAL AGENCY, DETERMINES THAT ALLOWING THE UNIT TO RESPOND
WOULD JEOPARDIZE A PENDING OR POTENTIAL CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION.
(C) A REPORT ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL BE POSTED TO THE OFFICE’S WEBSITE.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
5–305.

HOUSE BILL 1064
Subject to the limitations of § 5–306 of this subtitle, a supervisor, appointing
authority, or the head of a principal unit may not take or refuse to take any personnel
action as a reprisal against:
(1) an employee who discloses information that the employee reasonably
believes evidences:
(i) an abuse of authority, gross mismanagement, or gross waste of
money;
(ii) a substantial and specific danger to public health or safety; or
(iii) a violation of law;
(2) an employee of the Department of Juvenile Services who discloses
information to the Director of Juvenile Justice Monitoring or staff of the Office of the
Correctional Ombudsman, including the Juvenile Justice Monitoring Unit relating to the
Unit’s duties under § 9–4014 of the State Government Article;
(3) an employee of the Department of Public Safety and Correctional
Services who discloses information to the Correctional Ombudsman or staff of the Office of
the Correctional Ombudsman relating to the Office’s duties under § 9–4004 of the State
Government Article; or
(4) AN EMPLOYEE WHO MAKES A COMPLAINT OR WHO PROVIDES
INFORMATION TO THE INSPECTOR GENERAL OF THE STATE OR STAFF OF THE
MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL RELATING TO WASTE,
MISMANAGEMENT, MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION;
(5) an employee who, following a disclosure under item (1), (2), [or] (3), OR
(4) of this section, seeks a remedy provided under this subtitle or any other law or policy
governing the employee’s unit.
5–306.
Section 5–305 of this subtitle applies to a disclosure that is specifically prohibited by
law only if that disclosure is made exclusively to the Attorney General OR THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL OF THE STATE in the manner allowed in § 5–313 of this subtitle.
5–313.
(A) For purposes of this subtitle, the Attorney General shall:
(1) designate an assistant Attorney General to receive from applicants and
employees any information the disclosure of which is otherwise protected by law;

HOUSE BILL 1064 13
(2) investigate each allegation of illegality or impropriety;
(3) take appropriate legal action; and
(4) if the investigation concerns an allegation of illegality or impropriety in
the Executive Branch, submit a confidential report to the Governor that describes the
content of the disclosure.
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL OF THE
STATE SHALL:
(1) INVESTIGATE EACH COMPLAINT OF WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT,
MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION MADE BY AN EMPLOYEE; AND
(2) TAKE APPROPRIATE LEGAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Governor may transfer
positions and funds appropriated for positions from agencies, departments, or units of the
Executive Branch of State government to the Maryland Office of the Inspector General
established under Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That all employees who are
transferred to the Maryland Office of the Inspector General as a result of this Act shall be
transferred without diminution of their rights, benefits, employment, or retirement status.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.